Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Public Utilities Generally
278.190.
Procedure when new schedule of rates filed — Suspension of new rate schedule — Burden of proof — Refunds.

Whenever any utility files with the commission any schedule stating new rates, the commission may, upon its own motion, or upon complaint as provided in KRS

278.260

, and upon reasonable notice, hold a hearing concerning the reasonableness of the new rates.

Pending the hearing and the decision thereon, and after notice to the utility, the commission may, at any time before the schedule becomes effective, suspend the operation of the schedule and defer the use of the rate, charge, classification, or service, but not for a longer period than five (5) months beyond the time when it would otherwise go into effect if an historical test period is used, or longer than six (6) months if a forward-looking test period is used, pursuant to KRS

278.192

; and after such hearing, either completed before or after the rate, charge, classification, or service goes into effect, the commission may make those orders with reference thereto as it deems proper in the matter. If the proceeding has not been concluded and an order made at the expiration of five (5) months, or six (6) months, as appropriate, the utility may place the proposed change of rate, charge, classification, or service in effect at the end of that period after notifying the commission, in writing, of its intention so to do. Where increased rates or charges are thus made effective, the commission may, by order, require the interested utility or utilities to maintain their records in a manner as will enable them, or the commission, or any of its customers, to determine the amounts to be refunded and to whom due in the event a refund is ordered, and upon completion of the hearing and decision may, by further order, require such utility or utilities to refund to the persons in whose behalf the amounts were paid that portion of the increased rates or charges as by its decision shall be found unreasonable. Provided, however, if the commission, at any time, during the suspension period, finds that the company’s credit or operations will be materially impaired or damaged by the failure to permit the rates to become effective during the period, the commission may, after any hearing or hearings, permit all or a portion of the rates to become effective under terms and conditions as the commission may, by order, prescribe.

At any hearing involving the rate or charge sought to be increased, the burden of proof to show that the increased rate or charge is just and reasonable shall be upon the utility, and the commission shall give to the hearing and decision of such questions preference over other questions pending before it and decide the same as speedily as possible, and in any event not later than ten (10) months after the filing of such schedules.

If the commission, by order, directs any utility to make a refund, as hereinabove provided, of all or any portion of the increased rates or charges, the utility shall make the refund within sixty (60) days after a final determination of the proceeding by an order of the court or commission with or without interest in the discretion of the commission. If the utility fails to make the refund within sixty (60) days after the final determination, any party entitled to a refund may, after ten (10) days’ written demand, bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction of this state, and may recover, in addition to the amount of the refund due, legal interest, court costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees. No such action may be maintained unless instituted within one (1) year after the final determination. Any number of persons entitled to refunds may join in as plaintiffs in a single action and the court shall render a judgment severally for each plaintiff as his interest may appear.

History.

3952-16: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 46, § 2; 1978, ch. 379, § 26, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 24, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 242, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 123, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 308, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

278.192.
Test period for proposed rate increase.

For the purpose of justifying the reasonableness of a proposed general increase in rates, the commission shall allow a utility to utilize either an historical test period of twelve (12) consecutive calendar months, or a forward-looking test period corresponding to the first twelve (12) consecutive calendar months the proposed increase would be in effect after the maximum suspension provided in KRS 278.190(2).

Any application utilizing a forward-looking test period shall include a base period to be filed with the application, which begins not more than nine (9) months prior to the date of filing, consisting of not less than six (6) months of actual historical data and not more than six (6) months of estimated data at the time of filing.

Actual results for the estimated months of the base period shall be filed no later than forty-five (45) days after the last day of the base period.

Upon the filing of an application for a proposed increase in rates based on either a historical or a forward-looking test period, any intervening party in opposition to such application shall have the right to examine all data, including individual invoices, which comprise the actual expenditures of the utility incurred for ratemaking purposes for the preceding twelve (12) month period immediately prior to the filing date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 308, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

278.200.
Power to regulate rates and service standards fixed by agreement with city.

The commission may, under the provisions of this chapter, originate, establish, change, promulgate and enforce any rate or service standard of any utility that has been or may be fixed by any contract, franchise or agreement between the utility and any city, and all rights, privileges and obligations arising out of any such contract, franchise or agreement, regulating any such rate or service standard, shall be subject to the jurisdiction and supervision of the commission, but no such rate or service standard shall be changed, nor any contract, franchise or agreement affecting it abrogated or changed, until a hearing has been had before the commission in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

History.

3952-27: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 27, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 25, effective July 15, 1982.

278.210.
Examination and testing of meters and meter-testing devices.

The commission may provide instruments for, and carry on, the examination and testing of any meter or appliance used to measure the product or service of any utility, and the examination and testing of any instrument used by a utility to test the accuracy of any meter or appliance used to measure its products or services.

Any patron of a utility may, upon request and payment of the fees fixed by the commission, have a test made of the meter or appliance by which his use of the products or services of the utility is measured.

The commission may establish reasonable fees for testing such meters and appliances at the request of a patron of a utility. If the appliance is found to be commercially defective or inaccurate to the extent of more than two percent (2%) to the disadvantage of the patron, the fees shall be repaid to the patron and paid by the utility.

If a utility demonstrates through sample testing that no statistically significant number of its meters over-register above the limits set out in subsection (3) of this section, the meter testing frequency shall be that which is determined by the utility to be cost effective. This determination by the utility shall be based on established scientific, engineering, and economic methods and shall be documented in an application properly filed with the commission.

History.

3952-26: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 28, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 26, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 218, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

278.212.
Filing of plans for electrical interconnection with merchant electric generating facility — Costs of upgrading existing grid.

No utility shall begin the construction or installation of any property, equipment, or facility to establish an electrical interconnection with a merchant electric generating facility in excess of ten megawatts (10MW) until the plans and specifications for the electrical interconnection have been filed with the commission.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any costs or expenses associated with upgrading the existing electricity transmission grid, as a result of the additional load caused by a merchant electric generating facility, shall be borne solely by the person constructing the merchant electric generating facility and shall in no way be borne by the retail electric customers of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 365, § 11, effective April 24, 2002.

278.214.
Curtailment of service by utility or generation and transmission cooperative.

When a utility or generation and transmission cooperative engaged in the transmission of electricity experiences on its transmission facilities an emergency or other event that necessitates a curtailment or interruption of service, the utility or generation and transmission cooperative shall not curtail or interrupt retail electric service within its certified territory, or curtail or interrupt wholesale electric energy furnished to a member distribution cooperative for retail electric service within the cooperative’s certified territory, except for customers who have agreed to receive interruptable service, until after service has been interrupted to all other customers whose interruption may relieve the emergency or other event.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 365, § 12, effective April 24, 2002.

278.216.
Site compatibility certificate — Site assessment report — Commission action on application.

Except for a utility as defined under KRS 278.010(9) that has been granted a certificate of public convenience and necessity prior to April 15, 2002, no utility shall begin the construction of a facility for the generation of electricity capable of generating in aggregate more than ten megawatts (10MW) without having first obtained a site compatibility certificate from the commission.

An application for a site compatibility certificate shall include the submission of a site assessment report as prescribed in KRS 278.708(3) and (4), except that a utility which proposes to construct a facility on a site that already contains facilities capable of generating ten megawatts (10MW) or more of electricity shall not be required to comply with setback requirements established pursuant to KRS 278.704(3). A utility may submit and the commission may accept documentation of compliance with the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) rather than a site assessment report.

The commission may deny an application filed pursuant to, and in compliance with, this section. The commission may require reasonable mitigation of impacts disclosed in the site assessment report including planting trees, changing outside lighting, erecting noise barriers, and suppressing fugitive dust, but the commission shall, in no event, order relocation of the facility.

The commission may also grant a deviation from any applicable setback requirements on a finding that the proposed facility is designed and located to meet the goals of this section and KRS

224.10-280

,

278.010

,

278.212

,

278.214

,

278.218

, and

278.700

to

278.716

at a distance closer than those provided by the applicable setback requirements.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit a utility’s exemption provided under KRS

100.324

.

Unless specifically stated otherwise, for the purposes of this section, “utility” has the same meaning as in KRS 278.010(3)(a) or (9).

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 365, § 13, effective April 24, 2002; 2003, ch. 150, § 3, effective June 24, 2003.

278.218.
Approval of commission for change in ownership or control of assets owned by utility.

No person shall acquire or transfer ownership of or control, or the right to control, any assets that are owned by a utility as defined under KRS 278.010(3)(a) without prior approval of the commission, if the assets have an original book value of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more and:

The assets are to be transferred by the utility for reasons other than obsolescence; or

The assets will continue to be used to provide the same or similar service to the utility or its customers.

The commission shall grant its approval if the transaction is for a proper purpose and is consistent with the public interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 365, § 14, effective April 24, 2002.

278.220.
Uniform system of accounts for utilities.

The commission may establish a system of accounts to be kept by utilities subject to its jurisdiction, or may classify utilities and establish a system of accounts for each class, and may prescribe the manner in which such accounts shall be kept. The system established shall conform as nearly as practicable to the uniform system of accounts prescribed by the National Association of Regulatory Utility Commissioners, except that the system established for telephone and telegraph companies shall conform as nearly as practicable to the system adopted or approved by the Federal Communications Commission and the system established for gas and electric companies shall conform as nearly as practicable to the system adopted or approved by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

History.

3952-22: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 29, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 27, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 300, § 3, effective July 15, 1986.

278.2201.
Prohibition against subsidy of nonregulated activity — Separate accounting.

A utility shall not subsidize a nonregulated activity provided by an affiliate or by the utility itself. The commission shall require all utilities providing nonregulated activities, either directly or through an affiliate, to keep separate accounts and allocate costs in accordance with procedures established by the commission. The commission may promulgate administrative regulations that will assist the commission in enforcing this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 2, effective July 14, 2000.

278.2203.
Cost allocation of regulated and nonregulated activity.

A utility that engages in a nonregulated activity shall identify all costs of the nonregulated activity and report the costs in accordance with the guidelines in the USoA and the cost allocation methods described in subsection (2) of this section.

In allocating costs between regulated and nonregulated activities, a utility shall utilize one (1) of the following cost allocation methods:

The fully distributed cost method; or

A cost allocation method recognized or mandated by the rules of the SEC promulgated pursuant to 15

U.S.C. sec. 79

, et seq., or promulgated by the FERC or by the USDA.

A utility’s compliance with federal cost allocation methods shall constitute compliance with the provisions of KRS

278.010

to

278.450

.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) to (3) of this section, a utility may report an incidental nonregulated activity as a regulated activity if:

The revenue from the aggregate total of the utility’s nonregulated incidental activities does not exceed the lesser of two percent (2%) of the utility’s total revenue or one million dollars ($1,000,000) annually; and

The nonregulated activity is reasonably related to the utility’s regulated activity.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as requiring a utility to violate any cost allocation methods required to be employed under any service agreement validly existing as of July 14, 2000, for the term of the existing agreement, except where the commission makes the determination that a service agreement was executed for the purpose of avoiding provisions of KRS

278.010

to

278.450

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

278.2205.
Cost allocation manual for nonregulated activity — Contents — Maintenance.

Any utility that engages in a nonregulated activity whose revenue exceeds the amount provided for incidental nonregulated activities under KRS 278.2203(4)(a), shall develop and maintain a CAM as described in subsections (2) to (5) of this section.

A CAM shall contain the following information for a utility’s jurisdictional operations in the Commonwealth:

A list of regulated and nonregulated divisions within the utility;

A list of all regulated and nonregulated affiliates of the utility to which the utility provides services or products and where the affiliates provide nonregulated activities as defined in KRS 278.010(21);

A list of services and products provided by the utility, an identification of each as regulated or nonregulated, and the cost allocation method generally applicable to each category;

A list of incidental, nonregulated activities that are subject to the provisions of KRS

278.2203

(4);

A description of the nature of transactions between the utility and the affiliate; and

For each USoA account and subaccount, a report that identifies whether the account contains costs attributable to regulated operations and nonregulated operations. The report shall also identify whether the costs are joint costs that cannot be directly identified. A description of the methodology used to apportion each of these cost shall be included and the allocation methodology shall be consistent with the provisions of KRS

278.2203

.

Within two hundred seventy (270) days of July 14, 2000, the utility shall file:

A statement with the commission that certifies the CAM has been developed and will be adopted by the management, effective with the beginning of the next calendar year. The statement shall be signed by an officer of the utility; and

One (1) copy of the CAM.

Within sixty (60) days of any material change in matters required to be listed in the CAM, the utility shall amend the CAM to reflect the change.

The CAM shall be available for public inspection at the utility and at the commission.

The CAM shall be filed as part of the initial filing requirement in a proceeding involving an application for an adjustment in rates pursuant to KRS

278.190

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.

278.2207.
Transactions between utility and affiliate — Pricing requirements — Request for deviation.

The terms for transactions between a utility and its affiliates shall be in accordance with the following:

Services and products provided to an affiliate by the utility pursuant to a tariff shall be at the tariffed rate, with nontariffed items priced at the utility’s fully distributed cost but in no event less than market, or in compliance with the utility’s existing USDA, SEC, or FERC approved cost allocation methodology.

Services and products provided to the utility by an affiliate shall be priced at the affiliate’s fully distributed cost but in no event greater than market or in compliance with the utility’s existing USDA, SEC, or FERC approved cost allocation methodology.

A utility may file an application with the commission requesting a deviation from the requirements of this section for a particular transaction or class of transactions. The utility shall have the burden of demonstrating that the requested pricing is reasonable. The commission may grant the deviation if it determines the deviation is in the public interest.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to interfere with the commission’s requirement to ensure fair, just, and reasonable rates for utility services.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 5, effective July 14, 2000.

278.2209.
Documentation regarding cost allocation.

In any formal commission proceeding in which cost allocation is at issue, a utility shall provide sufficient information to document that its cost allocation procedures and affiliate transaction pricing are consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 6, effective July 14, 2000.

278.2211.
Remedies for noncompliance utility and affiliate — Access to records — Disallowance of costs — Audit.

If the commission finds that a utility has not complied with any provision of this chapter for any transaction between a utility and its affiliate, or if a utility has failed to provide sufficient evidence of its compliance, then the commission may:

Access the books and records of a utility’s nonregulated affiliate; and

Order that the costs attached to any transactions be disallowed from rates.

If, after inspecting an affiliate’s books and records, the commission finds that a utility has not complied with any provision of KRS

278.010

to

278.450

, the commission may perform a financial audit of the utility’s affiliate to the extent necessary to ensure compliance with KRS

278.010

to

278.450

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 7, effective July 14, 2000.

278.2213.
Separate recordkeeping for utility and affiliate — Prohibited business practices — Confidentiality of information — Notice of service available from competitor.

The provisions of this section shall govern a public utility company’s activities related to the sharing of information, databases, and resources between its employees or an affiliate involved in the marketing or the provision of nonregulated activities and its employees or an affiliate involved in the provision of regulated activities.

A utility and its affiliate shall be separate corporate entities and maintain separate books and records. If a utility and nonregulated affiliate have common officers, directors, or employees, the fees, compensation, and expenses of the individuals involved shall be subject to the cost allocation requirements set forth in KRS

278.2203

and

278.2207

. Any utility that provides nonregulated activities shall separately account for all investments, revenues, and expenses in accordance with its filed cost allocation manual.

A utility shall not provide advertising space in its billing envelope to its affiliates or for its nonregulated activities unless it offers the same to competing service providers on the same terms it provides to its affiliates. This subsection applies to nonregulated activities only.

A utility shall not attempt to persuade customers to do business with its affiliates by offering rebates or discounts on tariffed services.

All utility company employees engaged in the merchant function shall abide by all standards promulgated by applicable FERC orders and regulations.

No utility employee shall share any confidential customer information with the utility’s affiliates unless the customer has consented in writing, or the information is publicly available or is simultaneously made publicly available.

All dealings between a utility and a nonregulated affiliate shall be at arm’s length.

Employees transferring from the utility to an affiliate shall not disclose to the affiliate confidential information or take with them any competitively sensitive materials.

Neither a utility nor its employees or agents shall solicit business on behalf of an affiliate or for its nonutility services.

A utility that carries out any research and development or joint marketing and promotion with its affiliate for its nonregulated activities shall be subject to the cost allocation requirements set forth in KRS

278.2203

.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, if a utility is engaged in a nonregulated activity, marketing employees for the nonregulated activity shall not have access to the customer information provided to the utility when the customer places an order for regulated service.

A utility shall not provide any type of undue preferential treatment to a nonregulated affiliate to the detriment of a competitor.

A utility shall notify the customer that competing suppliers of a nonregulated service exist if:

The utility receives a request for a recommendation from a customer seeking a specific service which is offered by the utility’s affiliate or by the utility itself; and

The utility mentions itself or its affiliate when making the recommendation to the customer.

The utility’s name, trademark, brand, or logo shall not be used by a nonregulated affiliate in any type of visual or audio media without a disclaimer. The commission shall develop specifications for the disclaimer. The disclaimer shall be approved by the commission prior to use in any advertisement by the utility’s affiliate.

A utility shall not enter into any arrangements for financing nonregulated activities through an affiliate that would permit a creditor upon default to have recourse to the assets of the utility.

A utility shall inform the commission of all new nonregulated activities begun by itself or by the utility’s affiliate within a time to be set by the commission.

Start-up costs associated with the formation of a nonregulated affiliate shall not be included in the utility’s rate base.

The commission may require the utility to file annual reports of information related to affiliate transactions when necessary to monitor compliance with these guidelines.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 8, effective July 14, 2000.

278.2215.
Exemptions.

The provisions of KRS

278.2201

to

278.2213

and KRS

278.2215

and

278.2219

shall not apply to telecommunications utilities, telecommunications services, nonprofit water or sewer utilities, or water districts.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 114, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.

278.2219.
Waiver or deviation from requirements of KRS 278.2201 to 278.2213.

Notwithstanding any provisions in KRS

278.2201

to the contrary, a utility may apply to the commission for a waiver or deviation from any or all provisions of KRS

278.2201

to

278.2213

.

The utility’s application to the commission shall:

Demonstrate the basis of the utility’s need to be granted a waiver or deviation; and

Contain, if appropriate, documentation regarding the costs and benefits of compliance with the provisions of KRS

278.2201

to

278.2213

.

The commission shall grant a waiver or deviation if the commission finds that compliance with the provisions of KRS

278.2201

to

278.2213

is impracticable or unreasonable. The findings of the commission shall be a final appealable order.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 511, § 10, effective July 14, 2000.

278.225.
Time limitation on billing — Liability for unbilled service.

All service supplied by a utility shall be billed within two (2) years of the service. No customer shall be liable for unbilled service after two (2) years from the date of the service, unless the customer obtained the service through fraud, theft, or deception.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 143, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

278.230.
Access to property, books and records of utilities — Reports and information may be required.

The commissioners and the officers and employees of the commission may, during all reasonable hours, enter upon the premises of any utility subject to its jurisdiction for the purpose of examining any books or records, or for making any examination or test, or for exercising any power provided for in this chapter, and may set up and use on such premises apparatus and appliances necessary for any such examination or test. The utility shall have the right to be represented at the making of any such examination, test or inspection.

The books, accounts, papers and records of the utility shall be available to the commission for inspection and examination. If the books, accounts, papers and records are not within the state, the commission may, by notice and order, require their production or the production of verified copies at such time and place as it designates, any expense incurred to be borne by the utility so ordered.

Every utility, when required by the commission, shall file with it any reports, schedules, classifications or other information that the commission reasonably requires. The commission shall prepare and distribute to the utilities blank forms for any information required under this chapter. All such reports shall be under oath when required by the commission.

History.

3952-13, 3952-20, 3952-23: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 30, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 28, effective July 15, 1982.

278.240.
Certified copies of commission’s records — Use as evidence.

Copies of official documents and orders filed or deposited according to law in the office of the commission, certified by a commissioner, or by the executive director under the seal of the commission, to be true copies of the originals, shall be evidence in like manner as the originals in all matters before the commission and in courts of competent jurisdiction.

History.

3952-41: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 31, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 29, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 166, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

278.250.
Investigation of condition of utility.

Whenever it is necessary in the performance of its duties, the commission may investigate and examine the condition of any utility subject to its jurisdiction. In conducting such investigation, the commission may proceed with or without a hearing as it deems best, but shall make no order without giving a hearing to the parties affected thereby.

History.

3952-21: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 32, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 30, effective July 15, 1982.

278.255.
Periodic management and operation audits.

The commission shall provide for periodic management and operation audits of each utility with annual intra-Kentucky assessable revenue as of December 31, 1983, under KRS 278.150(1) not less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) to investigate management effectiveness and operating efficiency. The commission shall complete or provide for a full and comprehensive audit of each such utility prior to January 1, 1990. After the initial audit of any utility, the commission may order a subsequent audit of that utility focusing on issues disclosed by the initial audit. A full and comprehensive audit of any utility initiated prior to July 13, 1984, may be deemed to satisfy the requirements of this subsection if the audit was required and directed by the commission and completed after July 1, 1983.

The commission may provide for management or operations audits, or both, of any utility under its jurisdiction on a regular or irregular schedule to investigate all or any portion of the management and operating procedures or any other internal workings of the utility.

Audits provided under this section may, at the discretion of the commission, be performed by the commission staff or by a competent, qualified and independent firm. When the commission orders an audit to be performed by an independent firm, the commission shall select the audit firm, which shall work for and under the direction of the commission, with the cost to be borne by the utility. The commission shall include the cost of conducting any audits required in this section in the cost of service of the utility for ratemaking purposes.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations setting forth the scope and application of audits, and procedures for the conduct of management and operations audits. The audit procedures shall provide the utility being audited the opportunity to comment at various stages of the audit, including an opportunity to comment on the initial work plan and the opportunity to review and comment on preliminary audit drafts prior to issuance of a final document. The results of all audits shall be filed with the commission and shall be open to public inspection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 46, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

278.260.
Jurisdiction over complaints as to rates or service — Investigations — Hearing.

The commission shall have original jurisdiction over complaints as to rates or service of any utility, and upon a complaint in writing made against any utility by any person that any rate in which the complainant is directly interested is unreasonable or unjustly discriminatory, or that any regulation, measurement, practice or act affecting or relating to the service of the utility or any service in connection therewith is unreasonable, unsafe, insufficient or unjustly discriminatory, or that any service is inadequate or cannot be obtained, the commission shall proceed, with or without notice, to make such investigation as it deems necessary or convenient. The commission may also make such an investigation on its own motion. No order affecting the rates or service complained of shall be entered by the commission without a formal public hearing.

The commission shall fix the time and place for each hearing held by it, and shall serve notice thereof upon the utility and the complainant not less than twenty (20) days before the time set for the hearing. The commission may dismiss any complaint without a hearing if, in its opinion, a hearing is not necessary in the public interest or for the protection of substantial rights.

The complainant and the person complained of shall be entitled to be heard in person or by an attorney and to introduce evidence.

History.

3952-33: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 33, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 242, § 3, effective July 15, 1982.

278.270.
Orders by commission as to rates.

Whenever the commission, upon its own motion or upon complaint as provided in KRS

278.260

, and after a hearing had upon reasonable notice, finds that any rate is unjust, unreasonable, insufficient, unjustly discriminatory or otherwise in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall by order prescribe a just and reasonable rate to be followed in the future.

History.

3952-14: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 379, § 34, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 31, effective July 15, 1982.

278.271.
Allowable recovery of costs not recovered in existing utility rates — Conditions — Duration of cost recovery.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon application by a regulated utility, the commission may allow recovery of costs which are not recovered in the existing rates of the utility for the purchase of electric power from a biomass energy facility that has received a certificate from the Kentucky State Board on Electric Generation and Transmission Siting pursuant to KRS

278.700

to

278.716

. No recovery shall be allowed unless the full costs of the purchase power agreement over the full term of the agreement, which shall be included as part of the application, have been found by the commission to be fair, just, and reasonable. In determining whether the agreement is fair, just, and reasonable, the commission may consider the policy set forth by the General Assembly in KRS

154.27-020

(2). The commission’s approval of cost recovery under this section shall be valid for the entire initial term of the agreement.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 3, § 1, effective March 5, 2013.

278.272.
Consideration of natural gas purchasing transactions in determining just and reasonable rates — Limitation of authorized rate of return for natural gas operations.

In determining just and reasonable rates, the commission shall investigate and review natural gas purchasing transactions of a utility, whose rates for retail sales of natural gas are regulated by the commission, from an affiliate. The commission shall limit the authorized rate of return of the utility for its natural gas operations to a level which, when considered with the level of profit or return the affiliate earns on natural gas transactions to such utility, is just and reasonable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 38, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

278.274.
Review of natural gas utility’s purchasing practices in determining reasonableness of proposed rates — Reduction of rates by commission.

In determining whether proposed natural gas utility rates are just and reasonable, the commission shall review the utility’s gas purchasing practices. The commission may disallow any costs or rates which are deemed to result from imprudent purchasing practices on the part of the utility.

When proposing new rates, the utility shall be required to prove that the proposal is just and reasonable in accordance with the requirements of this section.

It shall be presumed that natural gas purchases from affiliated companies are not conducted at arm’s length.

For purposes of this subsection, affiliated companies shall be defined as those in which one (1) or more of the owners control or have the right to control the business affairs of all affected companies.

In instances in which a utility purchases natural gas from an intrastate affiliate, the commission shall assume jurisdiction of the affiliated company as though it were a utility as defined in KRS

278.010

. The commission’s jurisdiction shall extend to that extent necessary to ensure that the rates charged the utility and ultimately to the consumer are just and reasonable.

If the commission determines that the rates charged by the utility are not just and reasonable in that the cost of natural gas purchased from the affiliated company is unjust or unreasonable, the commission may reduce the purchased gas component of the utility’s rates by the amount deemed to be unjust or unreasonable.

The commission may also reduce the rate charged by the affiliated company by the same amount.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 40, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

278.277.
Any coal severance taxes imposed a factor in any fuel adjustment clause review.

In any review by the commission of any fuel adjustment clause, for any contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2021, the commission shall, in determining the reasonableness of fuel costs in procurement contracts and fuel procurement practices, evaluate the reasonableness of fuel costs in contracts and competing bids based on the cost of the fuel less any coal severance tax imposed by any jurisdiction.

As used in this section, “fuel adjustment clause” means any clause or provision in any tariff or contract by which an electric utility may immediately recover increases in fuel costs subject to later scrutiny or review by the commission.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 142, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.